Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB596.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Biometric Identifier Signage Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Biometric identifier information." A physiological or biological characteristic that is used by or on behalf of a business, singly or in combination, to identify or assist in identifying an individual, including:(1) A retinal or iris scan.(2) A fingerprint or voiceprint.123456789101112131415161718 (3) A scan of hand or face geometry or any other identifying characteristic."Commercial establishment." A retail store, restaurant, hotel, motel or place of entertainment or amusement."Customer." A purchaser or lessee, or a prospective purchaser or lessee, of goods or services from a business."Financial institution." A bank, trust company, national bank, savings bank, Federal mutual savings bank, savings and loan association, Federal savings and loan association, Federal mutual savings and loan association, credit union, Federal credit union, branch of a foreign banking corporation, public pension fund, retirement system, securities broker, securities dealer or securities firm. The term does not include a commercial establishment whose primary business is the retail sale of goods and services to customers and provides limited financial services, including the issuance of credit cards or in-store financing to customers.Section 3. Collection, use and retention of biometric identifier information.(a) Signage.--Any commercial establishment that collects, retains, converts, stores or shares biometric identifier information of customers must disclose the collection, retention, conversion, storage or sharing, as applicable, by placing a clear and conspicuous sign near all of the commercial establishment's customer entrances notifying customers in plain, simple language that customers' biometric identifier information is being collected, retained, converted, stored or shared, as applicable.(b) Form of sign.--The sign under subsection (a) shall be made in a form and manner prescribed by the Attorney General by 20250HB0596PN0604 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regulation in consultation with the Bureau of Consumer Protection.(c) Unauthorized disclosure.--No commercial establishment may sell, lease, trade or share biometric identifier information in exchange for anything of value or otherwise profit from the transaction of biometric identifier information.Section 4. Civil action by customer.(a) Civil action.--A customer who is aggrieved by a violation of this act may institute a civil action on the customer's behalf against an offending party. At least 30 days prior to initiating an action against a commercial establishment for a violation of section 3(a), the aggrieved customer shall provide written notice to the commercial establishment stating the customer's allegation. If, within 30 days, the commercial establishment cures the violation and provides the aggrieved customer an express written statement that the violation has been cured and that no further violations shall occur, no action may be initiated against the commercial establishment for the violation. If a commercial establishment fails to cure the alleged violation, the aggrieved customer may initiate an action against the establishment. No prior written notice shall be required for actions alleging a violation of section 3(c).(b) Recovery.--The prevailing party of a civil action under subsection (a) may recover:(1) for each violation of section 3(a), damages of $500;(2) for each negligent violation of section 3(c), damages of $500;(3) for each intentional or reckless violation of section 3(a), damages of $5,000;(4) reasonable attorney fees and costs, including expert 20250HB0596PN0604 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 witness fees and other litigation expenses; and(5) other relief, including an injunction, as the court may deem appropriate.Section 5. Nonapplicability.(a) Biometric identifier information.--Nothing in this act shall apply to the collection, storage, sharing or use of biometric identifier information by the Commonwealth or any political subdivision, including employees and agents of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision.(b) Disclosure.--The disclosure required under section 3(a) shall not apply to any of the following:(1) A financial institution.(2) Biometric identifier information collected through photographs or video recordings, if:(i) the images or videos collected are not analyzed by software or applications that identify, or assist in the identification of, individuals based on physiological or biological characteristics; and(ii) the images or video are not shared, sold or leased to third parties other than law enforcement agencies.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB0596PN0604 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223